Maryland, session 2025, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NASDTEC” MEANS THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
OF STATE DIRECTORS OF TEACHER EDUCATION AND CERTIFICATION.
(B) EACH LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY IN THE STATE SHALL:
(1) BECOME AN ASSOCIATE MEMBER OF NASDTEC; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1025*

HOUSE BILL 1025
(2) UTILIZE NASDTEC’S EDUCATOR IDENTIFICATION
CLEARINGHOUSE TO SCREEN:
(I) EACH EDUCATOR EMPLOYED WITHIN THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM AS OF JULY 1, 2025; AND
(II) EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO APPLIES FOR AN EDUCATOR
POSITION WITHIN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.